West Virginia, session 2025, HB2242.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. Authorization for Department of health to promulgate legislative rules. §64-5-1. Department of Health. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on September 3, 2024, authorized under the authority of §16-5-3 of this code, modified by the Department of Health to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on November 25, 2024, relating to the Department of Health (vital statistics, 64 CSR 32), is authorized.